Utah statutes.
34A-2-416.   Additional benefits in special cases.
(1)  Benefits received by a wholly dependent person under this chapter or
Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, extend indefinitely if at the
termination of the benefits:
(a)  the wholly dependent person is still in a dependent condition; and
(b)  under all reasonable circumstances the wholly dependent person should be
entitled to additional benefits.
(2)  If benefits are extended under Subsection (1):
(a)  the liability of the employer or insurance carrier involved may not be
extended; and
(b)  the additional benefits allowed shall be paid out of the Employers'
Reinsurance Fund created in Subsection 34A-2-702(1).
